da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Cardio > Tilbehør og dele til cardiomaskiner > Tilbehør og dele til crosstrainer: Flaskeholdere til crosstrainere; Konsoller til crosstrainere; Overtræk til crosstrainere; Drivremme til crosstrainere; Pulsmålere til crosstrainere; Reservedele til crosstrainer; Tabletholder til crosstrainer
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Cardio > Accesorii și piese pentru aparate de fitness > Accesorii și piese pentru biciclete eliptice: Suporturi pentru sticlă la biciclete eliptice; Console pentru biciclete eliptice; Huse pentru biciclete eliptice; Curele de transmisie pentru biciclete eliptice; Monitoare de ritm cardiac pentru biciclete eliptice; Piese de schimb pentru biciclete eliptice; Suporturi pentru tablete pentru biciclete eliptice
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Konditionsträning > Tillbehör och delar till konditionsträningsmaskiner > Tillbehör och delar till ellipstränare: Flaskhållare för crosstrainers; Konsoler för crosstrainers; Överdrag för crosstrainers; Drivremmar för crosstrainers; Pulsmätare för crosstrainers; Ersättningsdelar för ellipstränare; Surfplattehållare för ellipstränare
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Кардио тренировки > Аксесоари и части за машини за кардио > Аксесоари и части за елиптичен тренажор: Поставки за бутилки за кростренажор; Конзолен кростренажор; Покривала за кростренажор; Задвижващи ремъци за кростренажор; Монитори за пулс за кростренажор; Резервни части за елиптичен тренажор; Държачи за таблети за елиптичен тренажор
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Cardio > Accessori e ricambi per macchine cardio > Accessori e parti per trainer ellittico: Portaborracce per ellittiche; Console per ellittiche; Coperture per ellittiche; Cinghie di trasmissione per ellittiche; Cardiofrequenzimetri per ellittiche; Parti di ricambio per trainer ellittico; Supporti per tablet per ellittica
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Cardio > Accessoires et pièces pour machines cardio > Accessoires et pièces pour vélo elliptique: Porte-bidons pour vélos elliptiques; Consoles pour vélos elliptiques; Housses pour vélos elliptiques; Courroies de transmission pour vélos elliptiques; Cardiofréquencemètres pour vélos elliptiques; Pièces de rechange pour vélo elliptique; Supports de tablette pour vélo elliptique
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Cardio > Accessoires en onderdelen voor cardioapparaten > Accessoires en onderdelen voor crosstrainers: Crosstrainerbidonhouders; Crosstrainerconsoles; Crosstrainerhoezen; Crosstraineraandrijfriemen; Crosstrainerhartslagmeters; Vervangingsonderdelen voor crosstrainers; Tablethouders voor crosstrainers
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Cardio > Cardio Machine Accessories & Parts > Elliptical Trainer Accessories & Parts: Elliptical Trainer Bottle Holders; Elliptical Trainer Consoles; Elliptical Trainer Covers; Elliptical Trainer Drive Belts; Elliptical Trainer Heart Rate Monitors; Elliptical Trainer Replacement Parts; Elliptical Trainer Tablet Holders
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Cardio > Zubehör und Teile für Cardiogeräte > Zubehör und Teile für Crosstrainer: Crosstrainer-Flaschenhalter; Crosstrainer-Konsolen; Crosstrainer-Abdeckungen; Crosstrainer-Antriebsriemen; Crosstrainer-Pulsmesser; Ersatzteile für Crosstrainer; Tablet-Halter für Crosstrainer
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Kardiotreniruotės > Kardiotreniruoklių priedai ir dalys > Elipsinių treniruoklių priedai ir dalys: Elipsinių treniruoklių gertuvių laikikliai; Elipsinių treniruoklių konsolės; Elipsinių treniruoklių uždangalai; Elipsinių treniruoklių pavaros diržai; Elipsinio treniruoklio širdies ritmo monitoriai; Elipsinių treniruoklio atsarginės dalys; Elipsinių treniruoklių planšetinių kompiuterių laikikliai
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Bài tập dành cho tim > Phụ kiện và bộ phận máy tập tim mạch > Phụ kiện & bộ phận máy tập đạp xe elip: Khay để bình nước máy tập toàn thân; Bảng điều khiển máy tập toàn thân; Vỏ bọc máy tập toàn thân; Dây curoa máy tập toàn thân; Thiết bị đo nhịp tim máy tập toàn thân; Phụ tùng thay thế máy tập đạp xe elip; Giá đỡ máy tính bảng cho máy tập đạp xe elip
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardiofitness > Acessórios e peças para máquina de cardiofitness > Acessórios e peças para bicicleta elíptica: Suportes de garrafas para bicicletas elíticas; Consolas de bicicletas elíticas; Capas para bicicletas elíticas; Correias de transmissão para bicicletas elíticas; Monitores de ritmo cardíaco para bicicletas elíticas; Peças de substituição para bicicleta elíptica; Suportes de tablet para bicicleta elíptica
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Kardio cvičenie > Príslušenstvo a diely kardio prístrojov > Príslušenstvo a diely pre eliptický trenažér: Držiaky fľaše pre eliptický trenažér; Konzoly pre eliptické trenažéry; Obaly na eliptické trenažéry; Pohonné remene eliptických trenažérov; Monitory srdcovej frekvencie na eliptických trenažéroch; Náhradné diely pre eliptický trenažér; Držiaky tabletu pre eliptický trenažér
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Kardió > Kardiógép-kiegészítők és -alkatrészek > Elliptikustréner-kiegészítők és -alkatrészek: Elliptikus tréner kulacstartók; Elliptikus tréner konzolok; Elliptikus tréner takaróponyvák; Elliptikus tréner hajtószíjak; Elliptikus tréner pulzusmérők; Elliptikustréner-cserealkatrészek; Elliptikustréner-táblatartók
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Trening kardio > Akcesoria i części do urządzeń cardio > Akcesoria i części do trenażerów eliptycznych: Uchwyty na bidon do orbitreków; Konsole do orbitreków; Pokrowce na orbitreki; Paski napędowe do orbitreków; Pulsometry do orbitreków; Części zamienne do trenażerów eliptycznych; Uchwyty na tablet do trenażerów eliptycznych
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > 有酸素運動 > カーディオマシン関連用品・部品 > エリプティカルマシン関連用品・部品: エリプティカルトレーナー用ボトルホルダー; エリプティカルトレーナー用コンソール; エリプティカルトレーナー用カバー; エリプティカルトレーナー用ドライブベルト; エリプティカルトレーナー用心拍数モニター; エリプティカルマシン交換部品; エリプティカルマシン タブレットホルダー
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Kardiyo > Kardiyo Makinesi Aksesuarları ve Parçaları > Eliptik Bisiklet Aleti Aksesuarları ve Parçaları: Eliptik bisiklet matara tutucuları; Eliptik bisiklet konsolları; Eliptik bisiklet kılıfları; Eliptik bisiklet tahrik kayışları; Eliptik bisiklet nabız ölçerleri; Eliptik Bisiklet Aleti Yedek Parçaları; Eliptik Bisiklet Aleti Tablet Tutucuları
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Kestävyysurheilu > Kestävyysurheilulaitteiden lisätarvikkeet ja -osat > Crosstrainerin lisätarvikkeet ja -osat: Crosstrainereiden pullotelineet; Crosstrainereiden näytöt; Crosstrainereiden suojukset; Crosstrainereiden vetohihnat; Crosstrainereiden sykemittarit; Crosstrainerin varaosat; Crosstrainerin tablettitelineet
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Кардиотренировки > Аксессуары и детали для кардиотренажеров > Аксессуары и детали для эллиптических тренажеров: Держатели для бутылок для эллиптических тренажеров; Консоли для эллиптических тренажеров; Чехлы для эллиптических тренажеров; Приводные ремни для эллиптических тренажеров; Пульсометры для эллиптических тренажеров; Запасные детали для эллиптических тренажеров; Держатели планшетов для эллиптических тренажеров
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > คาร์ดิโอ > อุปกรณ์เสริมและอะไหล่เครื่องคาร์ดิโอ > อุปกรณ์เสริมและอะไหล่เครื่องอิลิปทิคัล: ที่วางขวดน้ำเครื่องเดินวงรี; หน้าจอเครื่องเดินวงรี; ผ้าคลุมเครื่องเดินวงรี; สายพานเครื่องเดินวงรี; เครื่องวัดอัตราการเต้นของหัวใจเครื่องเดินวงรี; อะไหล่ทดแทนเครื่องอิลิปทิคัล; ที่วางแท็บเล็ตตรงเครื่องอิลิปทิคัล
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Kardio > Tilbehør og deler til kardiomaskiner > Tilbehør og deler til ellipsemaskiner: Flaskeholdere for ellipsemaskiner; Konsoller for ellipsemaskiner; Trekk for ellipsemaskiner; Drivreimer for ellipsemaskiner; Pulsmålere for ellipsemaskiner; Reservedeler til ellipsemaskiner; Nettbretholdere til ellipsemaskiner
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Cardio > Accesorios y piezas para máquinas cardiovasculares > Accesorios y piezas para bicicleta elíptica: Portabotellas para bicicletas elípticas; Consolas para bicicletas elípticas; Fundas para bicicletas elípticas; Correas de transmisión para bicicletas elípticas; Monitores de frecuencia cardíaca para bicicletas elípticas; Piezas de repuesto para bicicleta elíptica; Soporte para tabletas para bicicleta elíptica
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Kardio > Trenažery – příslušenství a díly > Eliptické trenažery – příslušenství a díly: Držáky na láhev k eliptickým trenažérům; Konzole k eliptickým trenažérům; Obaly na eliptické trenažéry; Hnací řemeny k eliptickým trenažérům; Snímače tepové frekvence k eliptickým trenažérům; Eliptické trenažery – náhradní díly; Eliptické trenažery – držáky na tablet
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Ασκήσεις καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Αξεσουάρ & ανταλλακτικά για μηχανήματα καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Αξεσουάρ & εξαρτήματα για ελλειπτικά μηχανήματα: Βάσεις παγουριών ελλειπτικών μηχανημάτων; Κονσόλες ελλειπτικών μηχανημάτων; Καλύμματα ελλειπτικών μηχανημάτων; Ιμάντες κίνησης ελλειπτικών μηχανημάτων; Μετρητές καρδιακών παλμών ελλειπτικών μηχανημάτων; Ανταλλακτικά για ελλειπτικά μηχανήματα; Βάσεις tablet για ελλειπτικά μηχανήματα
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 有氧运动 > 有氧运动器械配件/零件 > 椭圆机配件/零件: 椭圆机水壶架; 椭圆机控制台; 椭圆机防尘罩; 椭圆机传动带; 椭圆机心率监测器; 椭圆机替换零件; 椭圆机平板电脑支架
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Kardio > Pribor i dijelovi za kardio sprave > Dodaci i dijelovi za eliptični trenažer: Držači za bocu za eliptični trenažer; Konzole za eliptični trenažer; Navlake za eliptični trenažer; Pogonski remeni za eliptični trenažer; Monitori otkucaja srca za eliptični trenažer; Zamjenski dijelovi za eliptični trenažer; Držači tableta za eliptični trenažer
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardio > Acessórios e peças para máquinas de cardio > Acessórios e peças para aparelho elíptico: Porta-garrafas para elípticos; Painéis de elípticos; Capas para elípticos; Correias de transmissão para elípticos; Monitores de frequência cardíaca para elípticos; Peças de reposição para aparelho elíptico; Suportes para tablet para aparelho elíptico
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 心肺運動 > 心肺訓練器材配件/零件 > 橢圓機配件/零件: 橢圓機水壺架; 橢圓機儀表板; 橢圓機保護套; 橢圓機傳動皮帶; 橢圓機心率監測器; 橢圓機更換零件; 橢圓機平板電腦支架
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 카디오 > 카디오 머신 부대용품/부품 > 일립티컬 트레이너 부대용품/부품: 일립티컬 트레이너 물병 홀더; 일립티컬 트레이너 콘솔; 일립티컬 트레이너 커버; 일립티컬 트레이너 구동 벨트; 일립티컬 트레이너 심박수 모니터; 일립티컬 트레이너 교체용 부품; 일립티컬 트레이너 태블릿 거치대
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Kardio > Dodatki in deli za kardio naprave > Dodatki in deli za eliptične trenažerje: Držala za steklenice za eliptične trenažerje; Konzole za eliptične trenažerje; Pokrivala za eliptične trenažerje; Pogonski jermeni za eliptične trenažerje; Merilniki srčnega utripa za eliptične trenažerje; Nadomestni deli za eliptične trenažerje; Držala za tablične računalnike za eliptične trenažerje